Florida, session 2026, SB1742.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSection 800.02, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 19 Section 2.âSection 800.035, Florida Statutes, is created to 20 read: 21 800.035âIndecent exposure of sexual organs to a minor.â 22 (1)âA person may not: 23 (a)âIntentionally expose his or her sexual organs in a lewd 24 or lascivious manner while viewing a person who is younger than 25 16 years of age for the purpose of attaining sexual arousal or 26 gratification; or 27 (b)âIntentionally perform any sexual act that does not 28 involve actual physical or sexual contact with the minor, 29 including, but not limited to, sadomasochistic abuse, sexual 30 bestiality, masturbation, or the simulation of any act involving 31 sexual activity, while viewing a person who is younger than 16 32 years of age for the purpose of attaining sexual arousal or 33 gratification. 34 (2)âFor the purposes of this section, the term âviewingâ 35 means that the offender knows that a person younger than 16 36 years of age is present, and the offender is reasonably capable 37 of being seen by such person. The term does not require such 38 person to be aware of any specific conduct or to see the 39 offenderâs sexual organs. 40 (3)âA person who violates subsection (1) commits the 41 offense of indecent exposure of sexual organs to a minor, a 42 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 43 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 44 (4)âA person does not commit the offense of indecent 45 exposure of sexual organs to a minor if the person is either of 46 the following: 47 (a)âA mother who is breastfeeding her baby. 48 (b)âAn individual who is nude in a place provided or set 49 apart for that purpose. 50 Section 3.âSection 914.16, Florida Statutes, is amended to 51 read: 52 914.16âChild abuse and sexual abuse of victims under age 16 53 or who have an intellectual disability; limits on interviews. 54 The chief judge of each judicial circuit, after consultation 55 with the state attorney and the public defender for the judicial 56 circuit, the appropriate chief law enforcement officer, and any 57 other person deemed appropriate by the chief judge, shall order 58 reasonable limits on the number of interviews which a victim of 59 a violation of s. 794.011, s. 800.04, s. 827.03, or s. 60 847.0135(5) who is under 16 years of age or a victim of a 61 violation of s. 794.011, s. 800.02, s. 800.03, or s. 825.102 who 62 has an intellectual disability as defined in s. 393.063 must 63 submit to for law enforcement or discovery purposes. To the 64 extent possible, the order must protect the victim from the 65 psychological damage of repeated interrogations while preserving 66 the rights of the public, the victim, and the person charged 67 with the violation. 68 Section 4.âParagraph (b) of subsection (7) of section 69 933.18, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 70 933.18âWhen warrant may be issued for search of private 71 dwelling.âNo search warrant shall issue under this chapter or 72 under any other law of this state to search any private dwelling 73 occupied as such unless: 74 (7)âOne or more of the following child abuse offenses is 75 being committed there: 76 (b)âCommission of an unnatural and lascivious act with a 77 child, in violation of s. 800.02. 78 79 If, during a search pursuant to a warrant issued under this 80 section, a child is discovered and appears to be in imminent 81 danger, the law enforcement officer conducting such search may 82 remove the child from the private dwelling and take the child 83 into protective custody pursuant to chapter 39. The term 84 âprivate dwellingâ shall be construed to include the room or 85 rooms used and occupied, not transiently but solely as a 86 residence, in an apartment house, hotel, boardinghouse, or 87 lodginghouse. No warrant shall be issued for the search of any 88 private dwelling under any of the conditions hereinabove 89 mentioned except on sworn proof by affidavit of some creditable 90 witness that he or she has reason to believe that one of said 91 conditions exists, which affidavit shall set forth the facts on 92 which such reason for belief is based. 93 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.